Utah statutes.
63J-1-602.2.   List of nonlapsing funds and accounts -- Title 31 through
Title 45.
(1)  Appropriations from the Technology Development Restricted Account created
in Section 31A-3-104.
(2)  Appropriations from the Criminal Background Check Restricted Account
created in Section 31A-3-105.
(3)  Appropriations from the Captive Insurance Restricted Account created in
Section 31A-3-304, except to the extent that Section 31A-3-304 makes the money
received under that section free revenue.
(4)  Appropriations from the Title Licensee Enforcement Restricted Account
created in Section 31A-23a-415.
(5)  The fund for operating the state's Federal Health Care Tax Credit
Program, as provided in Section 31A-38-104.
(6)  The Special Administrative Expense Account created in Section 35A-4-506.
(7)  Funding for a new program or agency that is designated as nonlapsing
under Section 36-24-101.
(8)  The Oil and Gas Conservation Account created in Section 40-6-14.5.
(9)  The Off-Highway Access and Education Restricted Account created in
Section 41-22-19.5.
